Wyoming statutes. Title 25 Institutions of the State
Chapter 5 Life Resource Center

§ 25-5-101.
Short title.

This act may be cited as the “Life Resource Center Act”.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 90, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-466.1; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-601; Laws 1981, ch. 164, § 2; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 9-6-641; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2008, ch. 85, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “Life Resource Center Act” for “Training School Act of 1981.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see § 25-5-102(b)(xxix).

§ 25-5-102.
Definitions.

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 70, § 2, ch. 85, § 2.

As used in this act:

“Acquired brain injury” means any combination of focal and diffuse central nervous system dysfunction, at the brain stem level and above, acquired after birth through the interaction of any external forces and the body, oxygen deprivation, infection, toxicity, surgery or vascular disorders not associated with aging;

“Active treatment” means a program which includes aggressive, consistent implementation of a program of specialized and generic training, treatment, health services and related services that is directed toward:

The acquisition of the behaviors necessary for the client to function with as much self determination and independence as possible; and

The prevention or deceleration of regression or loss of current optimal functional status.

“Adaptive behavior” means the collection of conceptual, social and practical skills that have been learned by people in order to function in their everyday lives;

“Administrator” means the administrator of the division;

“Assistive technology device” and “assistive technology service” mean as defined in 42 U.S.C. 15002;

“Center” means the Wyoming life resource center at Lander, Wyoming;

“Child” means any person under the age of eighteen (18);

“Client” means a person who has a disability and has been determined eligible, pursuant to department rules and regulation, and is receiving services from one (1) of the center’s programs;

“Client services” means diagnosis, education, training and care of persons who have been admitted to the center;

“Conservator” means as defined in W.S. 3-1-101(a)(iii);

“Department” means the state department of health;

“Director” means the director of the department of health;

“Disability” means a developmental disability as defined in 42 U.S.C. 15002 or a disability resulting from an acquired brain injury;

“Division” means the behavioral health division of the department of health;

“Guardian” means as defined in W.S. 3-1-101(a)(v);

“Guardian ad litem” means as defined in W.S. 3-1-101(a)(vi);

“Incompetent person” means adjudicated as meeting the definition in W.S. 3-1-101(a)(ix);

“Individual program plan” means a written statement of long-term and short-term goals and strategies for providing specially designed services to meet each client’s individual educational, physical, emotional and training needs;

“Informed choice” means making a decision based on adequate information. As appropriate, such information may include consideration regarding providers, methods, costs, duration, accessibility, customer satisfaction, probabilities, sources and consequences;

“Intellectual disability” means significantly subaverage general intellectual functioning with concurrent deficits in adaptive behavior manifested during the developmental period. “Intellectually disabled” means a person with an intellectual disability;

“Interdisciplinary team” means a group that represents the person, the person’s family or guardian, or the professions, disciplines or service areas that are relevant to identifying the client’s needs, as described in the comprehensive functional assessments and program design. The department shall provide by rule and regulation for the composition of interdisciplinary teams;

“Intermediate care facility for people with intellectual disability” means an intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disabilities (ICF/IID), as this phrase is used in applicable federal statutes, rules and regulations;

“Least restrictive environment” means the program, service and location which least inhibits a person’s freedom of movement, informed decision making and participation in community life while achieving the purposes of habilitation and treatment which best meet the needs of the person. The determination of least restrictive environment shall be individualized, based on a person’s need for medical, therapeutic, rehabilitative and developmental services and as a result of informed choice of the person or, if the person is a minor or a ward, his parent or guardian;

“Most appropriate” means an individualized determination of a person’s need for medical, therapeutic, rehabilitative and developmental services, based upon professional assessment and the informed choice of the person or, if the person is a minor or ward, his parent or guardian;

“Most integrated” means the setting that enables a person with a disability to have access to the same opportunities as a person without a disability to the fullest extent possible, including opportunities to live, learn, work, recreate and participate in family and community activities. Determinations of most integrated shall be individualized and based upon professional assessment and the informed choice of the person or, if the person is a minor or ward, his parent or guardian;

“Program manager” means the on-site supervisor and manager of the center;

“Screening team” means a group of appropriate professionals, appointed by the director pursuant to rules and regulations of the department, and assigned by the administrator to perform preliminary testing and assessment of persons for purposes of determining eligibility for services at the center;

“Ward” means as defined in W.S. 3-1-101(a)(xv);

“This act” means W.S.

25-5-101

through

25-5-135

;

“Domiciliary care” means the domiciliary care program, as defined by applicable federal statutes, rules and regulations;

“Exceptionally difficult behaviors” means a high level of assaultive or self-injurious behavior in a person with an intellectual disability or organic brain syndrome. These behaviors may include aggression and violent behavior, wandering, sexually inappropriate behavior, self-endangering behaviors or medication noncompliance. The level of behaviors shall be measured by a standardized assessment and pursuant to criteria established by the department under W.S. 25-5-105(a)(i);

“Hard to place” means a person who is:

Eligible for skilled nursing facility services pursuant to the long-term care assessment defined in W.S. 42-6-102(a)(vii);

Does not meet the criteria of paragraph (xxxi), (xxxiii) or (xxxiv) of this subsection; and

For whom no community skilled nursing facility service provider has been identified in the state within a time period defined by the department.

“High medical need” means a person who is:

Eligible for skilled nursing facility services pursuant to the long term care assessment defined in W.S. 42-6-102(a)(vii);

Does not meet the criteria of paragraph (xxxi) or (xxxiv) of this subsection; and

Would qualify for the extraordinary care nursing facility reimbursement rate, as defined by the department.

“Organic brain syndrome” means a decrease in mental function due to a medical disease, other than mental illness, as defined by the department. Organic brain syndrome may be the result of an acquired brain injury or the result of dementia caused by trauma, hypoxia, cardiovascular conditions including thrombotic and embolic events or degenerative, infectious, alcohol and drug related or metabolic disorders;

“Skilled nursing facility services” means skilled nursing facility services as defined by applicable federal statutes, rules and regulations.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 90, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 9-446.2; Laws 1977, ch. 26, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-602; Laws 1981, ch. 164, § 2; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 9-6-642; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2008, ch. 70, § 2; ch. 85, §§ 1, 2; 2016 ch. 44, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(iv), substituted “W.S.

3-2-101

through

3-2-112

” for “W.S.

3-4-101

through 3-4-109”; and in (a)(xiii) substituted “25-5-135” for “25-5-134.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2008 amendments. —

The first 2008 amendment, by ch. 70 § 2, repealed former (a)(vii) which defined “mentally retarded.”

Laws 2008, ch. 70, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2008.

The second 2008 amendment, by ch. 85, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2008, repealed former (a), which provided definitions for the Training School Act of 1981; and added (b).

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, substituted “behavioral health” for “developmental disabilities” in (b)(xiv); substituted “individuals with intellectual disabilities (ICF/IID), as this phrase is” for “the mentally retarded or intermediate care facility for people with mental retardation (ICFMR or ICF/MR), as those phrases are” in (b)(xxii); and added (b)(xxx) through (b)(xxxiii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 25-5-103.
Wyoming life resource center established; purpose.

Except as otherwise authorized by rules and regulations promulgated in accordance with W.S. 9-2-106(d), the Wyoming life resource center is established to provide the following residential, active treatment, assistive technology, medical and therapy services only to individuals for whom an interdisciplinary team has determined the center is the most appropriate, least restrictive and most integrated environment for delivery of the services as specified below:

Intermediate care facilities for people with intellectual disability in accordance with federal Medicare and Medicaid regulations;

Skilled nursing facility services to the following:

Persons with organic brain syndrome who manifest exceptionally difficult behaviors;

Persons with high medical need;

Persons who are hard to place.

Disability, therapeutic and assistive technology services for persons with a disability;

Training for state employees, other service providers and caregivers on disability, medical, developmental and therapy services;

Care provided under authority of the director pursuant to W.S. 9-2-106(d).

The Wyoming life resource center may provide technical assistance and assistive technology outreach services to persons made eligible pursuant to rules adopted by the department.

Any person residing at the Wyoming life resource center on April 1, 2016 pursuant to the requirements of this section prior to April 1, 2016 shall have the right to remain at the life resource center without regard to his continued qualification to remain at the center under this section, provided the center continues to have adequate resources to safely care for the person.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 90, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 9-466.3; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-603; Laws 1981, ch. 164, § 2; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 9-6-643; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1998, ch. 11, § 1; 2008, ch. 85, § 1; 2016 ch. 44, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, rewrote the section.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “assistive technology, medical and therapy services only to individuals for whom an interdisciplinary team has determined the center is the most appropriate, least restrictive and most integrated environment for delivery of the services as specified below” for “medical and therapy services to individuals with a disability” in (a); substituted “Skilled nursing facility services to the following” for “Services to persons with acquired brain injuries” in (a)(ii); and added (a)(ii)(A) through (c).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 25-5-104.
Administration and management of center.

The administration and management of the center is vested in the department.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 90, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 9-466.4; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-604; Laws 1981, ch. 164, § 2; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 9-6-644; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2008, ch. 85, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “center” for “training school.”

§ 25-5-105.
Rules and regulations; reports.

The department shall adopt rules and regulations which are in compliance with both federal regulations for intermediate care facilities for persons with intellectual disability and federal regulations for skilled nursing facilities, and which:

Establish standards for admission for residential services and discharge of clients receiving services in all programs administered by the center;

Establish standards for client services;

Provide for the administration of the center under the management of the division;

Prescribe professional standards for personnel employed at the center;

Implement this act;

Establish data reporting processes and report monthly to the director the number of persons served by the center, identified by service category, and the services provided to those persons.

Repealed by Laws 2015, ch. 59, § 2.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 90, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 9-466.10; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-609; Laws 1981, ch. 164, § 2; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 9-6-645; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2008, ch. 85, § 1; 2015 ch. 59, § 2, effective February 26, 2015; 2016 ch. 44, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, rewrote (a); and added (b).

The 2015 amendment,

deleted former (j), pertaining to requirements for reports from the department of health to the legislature.

Laws 2015, ch. 59, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, in (a), inserted “both” following “compliance with” and “and federal regulations for skilled nursing facilities” following “intellectual disability.”

Editor's notes. —

As to the effective date of the act, Laws 1971, ch. 90, was approved February 18, 1971, and became effective 90 days after the adjournment of the legislative session.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a)(v), see § 25-5-102(b)(xxix).

§ 25-5-106.
Donations for benefit of center; control and disposition thereof.

Money, personal property or real estate donated for the benefit of the center shall be held, controlled and distributed by the department according to the conditions of the donation. If there are no conditions of the donation, it shall be disposed of as provided in W.S.

25-5-107

.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 90, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 9-466.7; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-607; Laws 1981, ch. 164, § 2; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 9-6-646; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2008, ch. 85, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “center” for “training school.”

§ 25-5-107.
Disposition of monies received from sale of products or as compensation.

Except as provided by W.S.

25-5-106

, all monies received by the department for the clients in the center from the sale of products produced or grown by the center or as compensation from any source shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the general fund.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 90, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 9-466.9; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-608; Laws 1981, ch. 164, § 2; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 9-6-647; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2008, ch. 85, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “center” for “training school” twice and substituted “clients” for “residents.”

§ 25-5-108.
Appointment of program manager; duties; removal.

The director shall appoint a program manager of the center.

The program manager shall administer the center as directed by the administrator.

The director may remove the program manager in his discretion.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 90, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 9-466.11; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-610; Laws 1981, ch. 164, § 2; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 9-6-648; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2008, ch. 85, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “program manager” for “superintendent”, “center” for “training school”, and “administrator” for “director” throughout the section.

§ 25-5-109.
Inability or refusal to pay for services.

and (b) Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 50, § 4.

No person shall be denied admission to or services by the center because of the inability of the person, his parent or guardian to pay the cost of the services received.

Clients of the center who are not eligible under the Wyoming Medical Assistance and Services Act shall be responsible for the cost of services and treatment as provided in title 25, chapter 11, article 1. However, no person who was a client of the center as of June 30, 2008 shall be denied admission to or services by the center because of the refusal of the client’s parent or guardian to pay the cost of the services received.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 90, § 15; W.S. 1957, § 9-466.15; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-614; Laws 1981, ch. 164, § 2; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 9-6-649; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1986, ch. 25, § 2; 1989, ch. 50, § 4; 2008, ch. 85, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “center” for “training school” in (c); and rewrote (d).

§ 25-5-110.
Special education for minors and costs thereof.

and (b) Repealed by Laws 1986, ch. 25, § 3.

Clients who are between the ages of five (5) and twenty-one (21) years of age shall be provided special education and related services through the clients’ resident school districts. This subsection does not relieve an insurer or similar third party from an otherwise valid obligation to pay for services provided to the client.

and (e) Repealed by Laws 1986, ch. 25, § 3.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 164, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-650; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1986, ch. 25, § 3; 1987, ch. 218, § 2; 2008, ch. 85, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, in (c), substituted references to “client” for references to “resident”; and substituted “through the clients' resident school districts” for “at no cost to their parents or estates.”

§§ 25-5-111 through 25-5-113.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1986, ch. 25, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1981, ch. 164, § 1, related to review of the fee schedule for services at the training school and procedure for delinquent payments.

§ 25-5-114.
Eligibility for admission; appropriateness of services.

Except as otherwise authorized by rules and regulations promulgated in accordance with W.S. 9-2-106(d), a person shall be admitted to the center only if he is an individual qualifying for services under W.S. 25-5-103(a) and his preadmission evaluation and screening does not indicate that he would be more appropriately served by the Wyoming state hospital, a community program or a public school program.

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 85, § 2.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 90, § 14; W.S. 1957, § 9-466.14; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-613; Laws 1981, ch. 164, § 2; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 9-6-654; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1998, ch. 11, § 1; 2008, ch. 70, § 1; ch. 85, §§ 1, 2; 2016 ch. 44, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2008 amendments. —

The first 2008 amendment, by ch. 70, § 1, substituted “intellectual disability” for “mental retardation” in (b).

Laws 2008, ch. 70, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2008.

The second 2008 amendment, by ch. 85, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2008, in (a) substituted “center” for “training school” and inserted the reference to screening; and repealed former (b), which provided criteria for training school admission for a person convicted of a criminal act.

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, in (a), deleted “not” following
“person shall”, inserted “only if he is an individual
qualifying for services under
W.S. 25-5-103(a) and”
following “admitted to the center” and “does
note” following “and screening.”

§ 25-5-115.
Preadmission screening for residential services; preparation and supervision thereof; disposition of findings.

Admission to the center shall be upon written application to the division and shall be based upon the preadmission screening and assessment:

The preadmission screening and assessment shall be made by a screening team under the supervision of the administrator or his designee, using appropriate professionals and screening and assessment methods as provided in department rules and regulations;

The preadmission screening and assessment shall be completed not more than thirty (30) days after an application for admission;

Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 44, § 2.

As part of the application process, division staff shall provide prospective clients and their families or guardians information about center services and similar services available in the client’s community or elsewhere in the state.

Within ten (10) days of completion of the preadmission screening and assessment, the findings shall be given to the applicant. If ordered by the court, the preadmission screening and assessment shall also be filed with the court.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 90, § 16; W.S. 1957, § 9-466.16; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-615; Laws 1981, ch. 164, § 2; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 9-6-655; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2008, ch. 85, § 1; 2016 ch. 44, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, rewrote (a) through (a)(iii) and inserted (a)(iv); and in (b) twice substituted “screening and assessment” for “evaluation.”

The 2016 amendments. —

The first 2016 amendment by ch. 44 § 1, effective July 1, 2016, in (a), deleted “pursuant to
W.S. 25-5-117(b)” following “to the division” in (a).

The second
2016 amendment, by ch. 44 § 2, effective July 1, 2016, repealed former (a)(iii), which read: “No person shall be admitted unless an interdisciplinary team has determined that the center offers the recommended and most appropriate services in a least restrictive and most integrated environment consistent with informed choice.”

§ 25-5-116.
Individual program plan; preparation and supervision thereof; review.

Each client admitted to the center shall have on file at the center an individual program plan. The individual program plans shall be prepared by an interdisciplinary team within thirty (30) days of admission for residential services under the supervision of the program manager. The plan shall be reviewed by the interdisciplinary team for appropriateness and feasibility of discharge or transition to another level of service thirty (30) days after implementation of the plan, at the end of each quarter for the first year and annually thereafter.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 164, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-656; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2008, ch. 85, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, rewrote the section.

Editor's notes. —

By § 4, ch. 164, Laws 1981, “this act” (§§

25-5-101

through

25-5-134

) was made effective on May 20, 1981.

§ 25-5-117.
Admission for residential services; application and contents thereof; written copy of rights; appeal of denied admissions.

A person determined by the preadmission screening and assessment to be eligible for admission to the center for residential services may be admitted as a client under one (1) of the following procedures:

An adult who has sufficient insight or capacity to make responsible application for admission for residential services may be admitted on his own application;

A minor or ward may be admitted upon application of his parent or guardian.

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 85, § 2.

At the time of admission for residential services, the program manager shall give a written copy of the rights provided in W.S.

25-5-132

to the client, his parent or guardian.

A person who is denied admission may appeal the decision to the department, in writing.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 90, § 17; W.S. 1957, § 9-466.17; Laws 1973, ch. 213, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-616; Laws 1981, ch. 164, § 2; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 9-6-657; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2008, ch. 85, §§ 1, 2.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, rewrote (a) and (c); and repealed (b), which pertained to the application for admission to the training school.

§ 25-5-118.
Release of voluntary client upon request; exceptions.

A voluntary client may be discharged by the administrator at any time within twenty (20) days of receipt of a written request for the release by the client, his parent or guardian, and the administrator shall arrange for appropriate transition services, except:

If the client was admitted on his own application and the request for discharge is made by a person other than the client, release shall be conditioned upon the client’s consent;

If the client is a minor or ward, his discharge shall be conditioned upon the consent of his parent or guardian;

If the administrator has probable cause to believe release of the client will endanger the life, health or safety of the client or others and he incorporates a written statement of the facts supporting his belief in the client’s file, he may apply for involuntary admission pursuant to W.S.

25-5-119

. The administrator, as a mandatory reporter, shall contact adult protective services for appropriate proceedings.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 90, § 18; W.S. 1957, § 9-466.18; Laws 1973, ch. 213, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-617; Laws 1981, ch. 164, § 2; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 9-6-658; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2008, ch. 85, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, rewrote the section.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 25-5-119.
Involuntary admissions; application to district court; representation of proposed client; preadmission screening; notice; hearing; independent screening; admissibility.

A person may be an involuntary client of the center if admitted pursuant to this section. Application for involuntary admission may be made by a parent, a guardian, the administrator or a social service agency. The application shall be filed with the district court in the county where the proposed client, his parent or his guardian resides.

When an application for involuntary admission is filed, the court shall appoint an attorney to represent the proposed client unless he retains counsel of his own choice. An attorney shall represent the proposed client at all hearings. The county shall compensate an appointed attorney in an amount fixed by the court as a reasonable fee.

The court shall order the center to conduct a preadmission screening and assessment of the proposed client. Notice of the order shall be served on the proposed client, his attorney and his parent or guardian. The order and the application for admission shall be served on the center and the department. If the preadmission screening and assessment report finds the center would be an appropriate placement, the court shall order a hearing. The proposed client shall have a right to seek an independent screening and assessment of his eligibility for admission at the state’s expense. The screening and assessment shall be admissible as evidence at the hearing as provided by W.S. 25-5-121(d).

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 90, § 20; W.S. 1957, § 9-466.20; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-619; Laws 1981, ch. 164, § 2; Sp. Sess. ch. 22, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 9-6-659; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2008, ch. 85, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “center” for “training school”, “client” for “resident”, “administrator” for “superintendent”, and “screening and assessment” for “evaluation” throughout the section.

Law reviews. —

For article, “A Preliminary Review of Wyoming's Revised Civil Commitment Procedures,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 531 (1982).

§ 25-5-120.
Court order setting hearing on involuntary application; service of notice; waiver.

The court shall fix a date for hearing on the application.

The order setting the hearing shall contain:

The date, time and place of the hearing;

The name and address of the applicant, the proposed client’s parent or guardian, and the attorney retained by the proposed client or appointed by the court;

The grounds alleged for the commitment of the proposed client;

The consequences of a finding that a person shall be admitted to the center for client services.

The court shall direct the clerk of the district court to give notice to each person named in the order:

By delivering a copy of the notice to the person being notified personally, not less than fourteen (14) days before the time set for hearing unless time is shortened by the court for good cause shown; or

By mailing a copy of the notice to the address of each person given in the application by certified mail, return receipt requested, not less than fourteen (14) days before the time set for hearing, unless the time is shortened by the court for good cause shown.

The court may order that notice be given to other persons. Notice may be waived in writing by any party except the proposed client’s attorney.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 90, § 21; W.S. 1957, § 9-466.21; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-620; Laws 1981, ch. 164, § 2; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 9-6-660; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2008, ch. 85, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, in (b), substituted “client” for “resident” and “center” for “training school”; substituted “client's” for “resident's” in (d).

§ 25-5-121.
Rights of proposed client and notified persons; confidentiality of hearing; admissibility of screening reports; findings by court or jury; amendment of admission order.

The proposed client has the right to appear, to be heard and to participate in every stage of the hearing unless the court finds that it would not be in the best interests of the proposed client. The court shall not exclude the proposed client from the hearing unless the application is accompanied by a written statement from a licensed physician and a court designated examiner, appointed at the time of the application, who is in no other manner involved in the proceedings, that attendance at the hearing would injure the proposed client’s health and well-being and describing his medical condition.

The proposed client is entitled, upon request, to a jury trial on the issue of his admission. The jury shall be selected pursuant to W.S.

1-11-101

through

1-11-129

.

The court shall exclude all persons not having an interest in the application. Unless the court orders an open hearing or the proposed client requests a jury trial, the hearing is confidential and shall be held in closed court.

Any person to whom notice is required to be given by W.S.

25-5-120

may testify and may present and cross-examine witnesses. The court may receive the testimony of other persons in its discretion. The screening and assessment report required by W.S.

25-5-115

, and any independent screening and assessment made under W.S.

25-5-119

, may be admitted as evidence and shall not be excluded on the ground of hearsay alone.

If the court or jury finds that specific care, treatment and service alternatives are available which are more appropriate than the center for the proposed client, the application shall be denied. If the court or jury finds by clear and convincing evidence that admission to the center would provide the most appropriate services for the proposed client, the court shall order the admission. In case of a nonjury hearing, the court shall enter findings of fact with the order of admission.

The proposed client or if a minor or ward, his parents or guardian or the center may petition the court to amend its order of admission on the grounds that appropriate and necessary services to the proposed client are available in a less restrictive environment than the center. The court may amend its order after notice and hearing pursuant to this act.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 90, § 22; W.S. 1957, § 9-466.22; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-621; Laws 1981, ch. 164, § 2; Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 9-6-661; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2008, ch. 85, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “1-11-129” for “1-11-128” in (b); substituted “ward” for “incompetent” and deleted “or guardian ad litem” following “guardian” in (f); and substituted “client” for “resident” and “screening and assessment” for “evaluation” throughout the section.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the second sentence in subsection (f), see § 25-5-102(b)(xxix).

Law reviews. —

For article, “A Preliminary Review of Wyoming's Revised Civil Commitment Procedures,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 531 (1982).

§ 25-5-122.
Appeals to supreme court; rules governing.

Any person aggrieved by any order entered under this act may appeal to the Wyoming supreme court. The appeal shall conform with the rules of civil procedure.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 90, § 24; W.S. 1957, § 9-466.24; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-623; Laws 1981, ch. 164, § 2; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 9-6-662; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

For rules of appellate procedure generally, see Rule 1 et seq., W.R.A.P.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence, see § 25-5-102(b)(xxix).

§ 25-5-123.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 85, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1971, ch. 90, § 26, related to preadmission medical examination.

Effective date. —

Laws 2008, ch. 85, § 4, provides:

“(a)
Section 3 of this act is effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.

“(b)
Except as provided in subsection (a) of this section, this act is effective July 1, 2008.”
Approved March 12, 2008.

§ 25-5-124.
Discharge of clients by administrator or by court; appeals to department.

An interdisciplinary team may recommend to the administrator discharge of a client with an appropriate transition plan from the center when placement at home, with another service provider or another program is appropriate for the client’s needs and abilities. The transition plan shall identify any recommended discharge conditions in the client’s best interest, including type of residence facility, supervision and any continuing medical, therapeutic, rehabilitative or developmental services. Based on the recommendations of the team, and with the consent of the client, or his parent or guardian if he is a minor or ward, the administrator shall place the client in the alternative setting. The administrator shall discharge the client when the client has been appropriately placed in an alternative program. If the client was admitted under a court order, the administrator shall petition the court, pursuant to W.S. 25-5-121(f).

If the client, or his parent or guardian if he is a minor or incompetent, disagrees with the decision of the administrator and the interdisciplinary team, the client, parent or guardian may appeal the decision to the director in writing. The department shall provide the client, parent or guardian with a decision in writing within thirty (30) days.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 164, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-664; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2008, ch. 85, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, added the second sentence in (a); and substituted “administrator” for “superintendent”, “client” for “resident”, and “director” for “department” throughout the section.

§ 25-5-125.
Transfer of clients for temporary care and treatment; consent; costs to be paid by center; third-party obligations not limited.

If the program manager determines it is appropriate for the welfare of a client, the client may be placed for temporary care and treatment in any public or private hospital, institution or residence in the state which provides services which will benefit the client. The transfer shall not be made without the consent of the client and his parents or guardian, or in the case of an involuntary client, without leave of the court, except in cases of medical emergency. During and after the transfer, the client remains a client of the center. The cost of the transfer and of the temporary treatment, care and training provided shall be borne by the center. This section does not limit the responsibility of third parties to pay for medical and other expenses incurred by contract or law.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 90, § 29; W.S. 1957, § 9-466.29; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-628; Laws 1981, ch. 164, § 2; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 9-6-665; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2008, ch. 85, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008,
substituted “center” for “training school”, “client” for “resident” and “program manager” for “superintendent” throughout the section.

§ 25-5-126.
Contracts with other states for interstate transfer of clients; payment of expenses therefor.

The department may enter into contracts with other states to provide for:

The admission to facilities, schools or hospitals in other states of persons admitted to or entitled to admission for residential services in the center, when it can be shown that admission to a facility in another state is in the best interests of the person and the state of Wyoming;

The admission to the center of residents of other states when it can be shown that admission to the center for residential services is in the best interests of the person and the state of Wyoming, and that the person’s need for services has been determined in accordance with this act.

The expense of transferring persons from the center to other states shall be paid by the center. The expense of transferring persons from other states to the center shall be paid by the state making the transfer to the center.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 90, § 30; W.S. 1957, § 9-466.30; W.S. 1977, § 9-6-629; Laws 1981, ch. 164, § 2; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 9-6-666; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2008, ch. 85, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “facilities” for “institutions” in (a)(i); and substituted “center” or “center for residential services” for “training school” throughout the section.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a)(ii), see § 25-5-102(b)(xxix).

§§ 25-5-127 and 25-5-128.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 85, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1971, ch. 90, § 31, related to community leave and return of residents absent without leave.

Effective date. —

Laws 2008, ch. 85, § 4, provides:

“(a)
Section 3 of this act is effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.

“(b)
Except as provided in subsection (a) of this section, this act is effective July 1, 2008.
Approved March 12, 2008.”